California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(g) Any revenues already received by the Arbitration Certification Program and deposited in the Vehicle Inspection and Repair Fund for the 1991–92 fiscal year that have not yet been spent shall be deposited into the Certification Account in the Consumer Affairs Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 970, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 1.5. DENIAL, SUSPENSION AND REVOCATION OF LICENSES [475. - 499.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [475. - 478.]

475.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this code, the provisions of this division shall govern the denial of licenses on the grounds of:

(1) Knowingly making a false statement of material fact, or knowingly omitting to state a material fact, in an application for a license.

(2) Conviction of a crime.

(3) Commission of any act involving dishonesty, fraud or deceit with the intent to substantially benefit himself or another, or substantially injure another.

(4) Commission of any act which, if done by a licentiate of the business or profession in question, would be grounds for suspension or revocation of license. 

(b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this code, the provisions of this division shall govern the suspension and revocation of licenses on grounds specified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a).

(c) A license shall not be denied, suspended, or revoked on the grounds of a lack of good moral character or any similar ground relating to an applicant’s character, reputation, personality, or habits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1289, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

476.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), nothing in this division shall apply to the licensure or registration of persons pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 6000) of Division 3, or pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 23000) or pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 19800) of Division 8.

(b) Section 494.5 shall apply to the licensure of persons authorized to practice law pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 6000) of Division 3, and the licensure or registration of persons pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 19800) of Division 8 or pursuant to Division 9 (commencing with Section 23000).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 455, Sec. 2.   (AB 1424)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

477.

As used in this division:

(a) “Board” includes “bureau,” “commission,” “committee,” “department,” “division,” “examining committee,” “program,” and “agency.” 

(b) “License” includes certificate, registration or other means to engage in a business or profession regulated by this code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 654, Sec. 5.)
-------------------------------------------

478.

(a) As used in this division, “application” includes the original documents or writings filed and any other supporting documents or writings including supporting documents provided or filed contemporaneously, or later, in support of the application whether provided or filed by the applicant or by any other person in support of the application.

(b) As used in this division, “material” includes a statement or omission substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the business or profession.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1289, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Denial of Licenses [480. - 489.]

480.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, a board may deny a license regulated by this code on the grounds that the applicant has been convicted of a crime or has been subject to formal discipline only if either of the following conditions are met:

(1) The applicant has been convicted of a crime within the preceding seven years from the date of application that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the business or profession for which the application is made, regardless of whether the applicant was incarcerated for that crime, or the applicant has been convicted of a crime that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the business or profession for which the application is made and for which the applicant is presently incarcerated or for which the applicant was
 released from incarceration within the preceding seven years from the date of application. However, the preceding seven-year limitation shall not apply in either of the following situations:

(A) The applicant was convicted of a serious felony, as defined in Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code or a crime for which registration is required pursuant to paragraph (2) or (3) of subdivision (d) of Section 290 of the Penal Code.

(B) The applicant was convicted of a financial crime currently classified as a felony that is directly and adversely related to the fiduciary qualifications, functions, or duties of the business or profession for which the application is made, pursuant to regulations adopted by the board, and for which the applicant is seeking licensure under any of the following:

(i) Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 3.

(ii) Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 7000) of Division
 3.

(iii) Chapter 11.3 (commencing with Section 7512) of Division 3.

(iv) Licensure as a funeral director or cemetery manager under Chapter 12 (commencing with Section 7600) of Division 3.

(v) Division 4 (commencing with Section 10000).

(2) The applicant has been subjected to formal discipline by a licensing board in or outside California within the preceding seven years from the date of application based on professional misconduct that would have been cause for discipline before the board for which the present application is made and that is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the business or profession for which the present application is made. However, prior disciplinary action by a licensing board within the preceding seven years shall not be the basis for denial of a license if the basis for that disciplinary action was a conviction that has been dismissed
 pursuant to Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, 1203.41, 1203.42, or 1203.425 of the Penal Code or a comparable dismissal or expungement. Formal discipline that occurred earlier than seven years preceding the date of application may be grounds for denial of a license only if the formal discipline was for conduct that, if committed in this state by a physician and surgeon licensed pursuant to Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2, would have constituted an act of sexual abuse, misconduct, or relations with a patient pursuant to Section 726 or sexual exploitation as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 729.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, a person shall not be denied a license on the basis that the person has been convicted of a crime, or on the basis of acts underlying a conviction for a crime, if that person has obtained a certificate of
 rehabilitation under Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code, has been granted clemency or a pardon by a state or federal executive, or has made a showing of rehabilitation pursuant to Section 482.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, a person shall not be denied a license on the basis of any conviction, or on the basis of the acts underlying the conviction, that has been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, 1203.41, 1203.42, or 1203.425 of the Penal Code, or a comparable dismissal or expungement. An applicant who has a conviction that has been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, 1203.41, or 1203.42 of the Penal Code shall provide proof of the dismissal if it is not reflected on the report furnished by the Department of Justice.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, a board shall not deny a license on the basis of an arrest that resulted in a disposition
 other than a conviction, including an arrest that resulted in an infraction, citation, or a juvenile adjudication.

(e) A board may deny a license regulated by this code on the ground that the applicant knowingly made a false statement of fact that is required to be revealed in the application for the license. A board shall not deny a license based solely on an applicant’s failure to disclose a fact that would not have been cause for denial of the license had it been disclosed.

(f) A board shall follow the following procedures in requesting or acting on an applicant’s criminal history information:

(1) A board issuing a license pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 5500), Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 5615), Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 7301), Chapter 20 (commencing with Section 9800), or Chapter 20.3 (commencing with Section 9880), of Division 3, or Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 19000) or Chapter
 3.1 (commencing with Section 19225) of Division 8 may require applicants for licensure under those chapters to disclose criminal conviction history on an application for licensure.

(2) Except as provided in paragraph (1), a board shall not require an applicant for licensure to disclose any information or documentation regarding the applicant’s criminal history. However, a board may request mitigating information from an applicant regarding the applicant’s criminal history for purposes of determining substantial relation or demonstrating evidence of rehabilitation, provided that the applicant is informed that disclosure is voluntary and that the applicant’s decision not to disclose any information shall not be a factor in a board’s decision to grant or deny an application for licensure.

(3) If a board decides to deny an application for licensure based solely or in part on the applicant’s conviction history, the board shall notify the applicant in writing
 of all of the following:

(A) The denial or disqualification of licensure.

(B) Any existing procedure the board has for the applicant to challenge the decision or to request reconsideration.

(C) That the applicant has the right to appeal the board’s decision.

(D) The processes for the applicant to request a copy of the applicant’s complete conviction history and question the accuracy or completeness of the record pursuant to Sections 11122 to 11127 of the Penal Code.

(g) (1) For a minimum of three years, each board under this code shall retain application forms and other documents submitted by an applicant, any notice provided to an applicant, all other communications received from and provided to an applicant, and criminal history reports of an applicant.

(2) Each board under this code shall retain the number of
 applications received for each license and the number of applications requiring inquiries regarding criminal history. In addition, each licensing authority shall retain all of the following information:

(A) The number of applicants with a criminal record who received notice of denial or disqualification of licensure.

(B) The number of applicants with a criminal record who provided evidence of mitigation or rehabilitation.

(C) The number of applicants with a criminal record who appealed any denial or disqualification of licensure.

(D) The final disposition and demographic information, consisting of voluntarily provided information on race or gender, of any applicant described in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C).

(3) (A) Each board under this code shall annually make available to the public through the board’s internet website and through a report
 submitted to the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature deidentified information collected pursuant to this subdivision. Each board shall ensure confidentiality of the individual applicants.

(B) A report pursuant to subparagraph (A) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(h) “Conviction” as used in this section shall have the same meaning as defined in Section 7.5.

(i) This section does not in any way modify or otherwise affect the existing authority of the following entities in regard to licensure:

(1) The State Athletic Commission.

(2) The Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education.

(3) The California Horse Racing Board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 453, Sec. 1.   (AB 1636)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

480.2.

(a) The Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, the State Athletic Commission, and the California Horse Racing Board may deny a license regulated by it on the grounds that the applicant has one of the following:

(1) Been convicted of a crime.

(2) Done any act involving dishonesty, fraud, or deceit with the intent to substantially benefit themselves or another, or substantially injure another.

(3) (A) Done any act that if done by a licentiate of the business or profession in question, would be grounds for suspension or revocation of
 license.

(B) The Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, the State Athletic Commission, and the California Horse Racing Board may deny a license pursuant to this subdivision only if the crime or act is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the business or profession for which the application is made.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, a person shall not be denied a license solely on the basis that the person has been convicted of a felony if that person has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation under Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code or that the person has been convicted of a
 misdemeanor if the person has met all applicable requirements of the criteria of rehabilitation developed by the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, the State Athletic Commission, and the California Horse Racing Board to evaluate the rehabilitation of a person when considering the denial of a license under paragraph (1) of subdivision (f).

(c) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this code, a person shall not be denied a license by the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, the State Athletic Commission, or the California Horse Racing Board solely on the basis of a conviction that has been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4, 1203.4a, 1203.41, or 1203.425 of the Penal Code. An applicant who has a conviction that has been dismissed pursuant to Section 1203.4, 1203.4a,
 or 1203.41 of the Penal Code shall provide proof of the dismissal.

(d) The Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, the State Athletic Commission, and the California Horse Racing Board may deny a license regulated by it on the ground that the applicant knowingly made a false statement of fact that is required to be revealed in the application for the license.

(e) The Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, the State Athletic Commission, and the California Horse Racing Board shall develop criteria to aid it, when considering the denial, suspension, or revocation of a license, to determine whether a crime or act is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the business or profession it regulates.

(f) (1) The Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, the State Athletic Commission, and the California Horse Racing Board shall develop criteria to evaluate the rehabilitation of a person either when:

(A) Considering the denial of a license under this section.

(B) Considering suspension or revocation of a license under Section 490.

(2) The Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, the State Athletic Commission, and the California Horse Racing Board shall take into account all competent evidence of rehabilitation furnished by the applicant or licensee.

(g) Except as
 otherwise provided by law, following a hearing requested by an applicant pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 485, the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, the State Athletic Commission, and the California Horse Racing Board may take any of the following actions:

(1) Grant the license effective upon completion of all licensing requirements by the applicant.

(2) Grant the license effective upon completion of all licensing requirements by the applicant, immediately revoke the license, stay the revocation, and impose probationary conditions on the license, which may include suspension.

(3) Deny the license.

(4) Take other action in relation to
 denying or granting the license as the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, the State Athletic Commission, or the California Horse Racing Board, in its discretion, may deem proper.

(h) Notwithstanding any other law, in a proceeding conducted by the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, the State Athletic Commission, or the California Horse Racing Board to deny an application for a license or to suspend or revoke a license or otherwise take disciplinary action against a person who holds a license, upon the ground that the applicant or the licensee has been convicted of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of the licensee in question, the record of conviction of the crime shall be conclusive evidence of the fact that the conviction occurred, but only of that fact, and the Bureau for Private
 Postsecondary Education, the State Athletic Commission, and the California Horse Racing Board may inquire into the circumstances surrounding the commission of the crime in order to fix the degree of discipline or to determine if the conviction is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of the licensee in question.

(i) Notwithstanding Section 7.5, a conviction within the meaning of this section means a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere. Any action that the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education, the State Athletic Commission, or the California Horse Racing Board is permitted to take following the establishment of a conviction may be taken when the time for appeal has elapsed, the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or when an order granting probation is
 made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under the provisions of Section 1203.4, 1203.4a,
 1203.41, or 1203.425 of the Penal Code.

(j) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 578, Sec. 3.   (AB 1076)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

480.5.

(a) An individual who has satisfied any of the requirements needed to obtain a license regulated under this division while incarcerated, who applies for that license upon release from incarceration, and who is otherwise eligible for the license shall not be subject to a delay in processing his or her application or a denial of the license solely
 on the basis that some or all of the licensure requirements were completed while the individual was incarcerated.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to apply to a petition for reinstatement of a license or to limit the ability of a board to deny a license pursuant to Section 480.

(c) This section shall not apply to the licensure of individuals under the initiative act referred to in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 1000) of Division 2.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 410, Sec. 1.   (AB 1702)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

481.

(a) Each board under this code shall develop criteria to aid it, when considering the denial, suspension, or revocation of a license, to determine whether a crime is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the business or profession it regulates.

(b) Criteria for determining whether a crime is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the business or profession a board regulates shall include all of the following:

(1) The nature and gravity of the offense.

(2) The number of years elapsed since the date of the offense.

(3) The nature and duties of the profession in which the applicant seeks licensure or in which the licensee is licensed.

(c) A board shall not deny a license based in whole or in part on a conviction without considering evidence of rehabilitation submitted by an applicant pursuant to any process established in the practice act or regulations of the particular board and as directed by Section 482.

(d) Each board shall post on its Internet Web site a summary of the criteria used to consider whether a crime is considered to be substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the business or profession it regulates consistent with this section.

(e) This section does not in any way modify or otherwise affect the existing authority of the
 following entities in regard to licensure:

(1) The State Athletic Commission.

(2) The Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education.

(3) The California Horse Racing Board.

(f) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 995, Sec. 7.   (AB 2138)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

482.

(a) Each board under this code shall develop criteria to evaluate the rehabilitation of a person when doing either of the following:

(1) Considering the denial of a license by the board under Section 480.

(2) Considering suspension or revocation of a license under Section 490.

(b) Each board shall consider whether an applicant or licensee has made a showing of rehabilitation if either of the following are met:

(1) The applicant or licensee has completed the criminal sentence at issue without a violation of parole or probation.

(2) The board, applying its criteria for rehabilitation, finds that the applicant is rehabilitated.

(c) This section does not in any way modify or otherwise affect the existing authority of the following entities in regard to licensure:

(1) The State Athletic Commission.

(2) The Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education.

(3) The California Horse Racing Board.

(d) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 995, Sec. 9.   (AB 2138)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

484.

No person applying for licensure under this code shall be required to submit to any licensing board any attestation by other persons to his good moral character.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1321.)
-------------------------------------------

485.

Upon denial of an application for a license under this chapter or Section 496, the board shall do either of the following:

(a) File and serve a statement of issues in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) Notify the applicant that the application is denied, stating (1) the reason for the denial, and (2) that the applicant has the right to a hearing under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code if written request for hearing is made within 60 days after service of the notice of denial. Unless written request for hearing is made within the 60-day period, the applicant’s right to a hearing is deemed waived.

Service of the notice of denial may be made in the manner authorized for service of summons in civil actions, or by registered mail addressed to the applicant at the latest address filed by the applicant in writing with the board in his or her application or otherwise. Service by mail is complete on the date of mailing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 758, Sec. 2.3.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

486.

Where the board has denied an application for a license under this chapter or Section 496, it shall, in its decision, or in its notice under subdivision (b) of Section 485, inform the applicant of the following:

(a) The earliest date on which the applicant may reapply for a license which shall be one year from the effective date of the decision, or service of the notice under subdivision (b) of Section 485, unless the board prescribes an earlier date or a later date is prescribed by another statute.

(b) That all competent evidence of rehabilitation presented will be considered upon a reapplication.

Along with the decision, or the notice under subdivision (b) of Section 485, the board shall serve a copy of the criteria relating to rehabilitation formulated under Section 482.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 758, Sec. 2.4.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

487.

If a hearing is requested by the applicant, the board shall conduct such hearing within 90 days from the date the hearing is requested unless the applicant shall request or agree in writing to a postponement or continuance of the hearing. Notwithstanding the above, the Office of Administrative Hearings may order, or on a showing of good cause, grant a request for, up to 45 additional days within which to conduct a hearing, except in cases involving alleged examination or licensing fraud, in which cases the period may be up to 180 days. In no case shall more than two such orders be made or requests be granted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 220, Sec. 1.   Effective June 30, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

488.

(a) Except as otherwise provided by law, following a hearing requested by an applicant pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 485, the board may take any of the following actions:

(1) Grant the license effective upon completion of all licensing requirements by the applicant.

(2) Grant the license effective upon completion of all licensing requirements by the applicant, immediately revoke the license, stay the revocation, and impose probationary conditions on the license, which may include suspension.

(3) Deny the license.

(4) Take other action in
 relation to denying or granting the license as the board in its discretion may deem proper.

(b) This section does not in any way modify or otherwise affect the existing authority of the following entities in regard to licensure:

(1) The State Athletic Commission.

(2) The Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education.

(3) The California Horse Racing Board.

(c) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 995, Sec. 11.   (AB 2138)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

489.

Any agency in the department which is authorized by law to deny an application for a license upon the grounds specified in Section 480 or 496, may without a hearing deny an application upon any of those grounds, if within one year previously, and after proceedings conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, that agency has denied an application from the same applicant upon the same ground.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 758, Sec. 2.5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Suspension and Revocation of Licenses [490. - 494.6.]

490.

(a) In addition to any other action that a board is permitted to take against a licensee, a board may suspend or revoke a license on the ground that the licensee has been convicted of a crime, if the crime is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the business or profession for which the license was issued.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a board may exercise any authority to discipline a licensee for conviction of a crime that is independent of the authority granted under subdivision (a) only if the crime is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the business or profession for which the licensee’s license was
 issued.

(c) A conviction within the meaning of this section means a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere. An action that a board is permitted to take following the establishment of a conviction may be taken when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code.

(d) The Legislature hereby finds and declares that the application of this section has been made unclear by the holding in Petropoulos v. Department of Real Estate (2006) 142 Cal.App.4th 554, and that the holding in that case has placed a significant number of statutes and regulations in question, resulting in potential harm to the consumers of California from licensees who have been
 convicted of crimes. Therefore, the Legislature finds and declares that this section establishes an independent basis for a board to impose discipline upon a licensee, and that the amendments to this section made by Chapter 33 of the Statutes of 2008 do not constitute a change to, but rather are declaratory of, existing law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 2.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

490.5.

A board may suspend a license pursuant to Section 17520 of the Family Code if a licensee is not in compliance with a child support order or judgment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 3.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

491.

Upon suspension or revocation of a license by a board on one or more of the grounds specified in Section 490, the board shall:

(a) Send a copy of the provisions of Section 11522 of the Government Code to the ex-licensee.

(b) Send a copy of the criteria relating to rehabilitation formulated under Section 482 to the ex-licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 678.)
-------------------------------------------

492.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, successful completion of any diversion program under the Penal Code, or successful completion of an alcohol and drug problem assessment program under Article 5 (commencing with Section 23249.50) of Chapter 12 of Division 11 of the Vehicle Code, shall not prohibit any agency established under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of this code, or any initiative act referred to in that division, from taking disciplinary action against a licensee or from denying a license for professional misconduct, notwithstanding that evidence of that misconduct may be recorded in a record pertaining to an arrest.

This section shall not be construed to apply to any drug diversion program operated by any agency established under Division 2 (commencing with Section 500) of this code, or any initiative act referred to in that division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 26, Sec. 15.   Effective March 30, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

493.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, in a proceeding conducted by a board within the department pursuant to law to deny an application for a license or to suspend or revoke a license or otherwise take disciplinary action against a person who holds a license, upon the ground that the applicant or the licensee has been convicted of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, and duties of the licensee in question, the record of conviction of the crime shall be conclusive evidence of the fact that the conviction occurred, but only of that fact.

(b) (1) Criteria for determining whether a crime is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the business or profession the board
 regulates shall include all of the following:

(A) The nature and gravity of the offense.

(B) The number of years elapsed since the date of the offense.

(C) The nature and duties of the profession.

(2) A board shall not categorically bar an applicant based solely on the type of conviction without considering evidence of rehabilitation.

(c) As used in this section, “license” includes “certificate,” “permit,” “authority,” and “registration.”

(d) This section does not in any way modify or otherwise affect the existing authority of the following entities in regard to licensure:

(1) The State Athletic Commission.

(2) The Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education.

(3) The California Horse Racing Board.

(e) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2020.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 995, Sec. 13.   (AB 2138)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Section operative July 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

494.

(a) A board or an administrative law judge sitting alone, as provided in subdivision (h), may, upon petition, issue an interim order suspending any licentiate or imposing license restrictions, including, but not limited to, mandatory biological fluid testing, supervision, or remedial training. The petition shall include affidavits that demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the board, both of the following:

(1) The licentiate has engaged in acts or omissions constituting a violation of this code or has been convicted of a crime substantially related to the licensed activity.

(2) Permitting the licentiate to continue to engage in the licensed activity, or permitting the licentiate to continue in the licensed activity without restrictions, would endanger the public health, safety, or welfare.

(b) No interim order provided for in this section shall be issued without notice to the licentiate unless it appears from the petition and supporting documents that serious injury would result to the public before the matter could be heard on notice.

(c) Except as provided in subdivision (b), the licentiate shall be given at least 15 days’ notice of the hearing on the petition for an interim order. The notice shall include documents submitted to the board in support of the petition. If the order was initially issued without notice as provided in subdivision (b), the licentiate shall be entitled to a hearing on the petition within 20 days of the issuance of the interim order without notice. The licentiate shall be given notice of the hearing within two days after issuance of the initial interim order, and shall receive all documents in support of the petition. The failure of the board to provide a hearing within 20 days following the issuance of the interim order without notice, unless the licentiate waives his or her right to the hearing, shall result in the dissolution of the interim order by operation of law.

(d) At the hearing on the petition for an interim order, the licentiate may:

(1) Be represented by counsel.

(2) Have a record made of the proceedings, copies of which shall be available to the licentiate upon payment of costs computed in accordance with the provisions for transcript costs for judicial review contained in Section 11523 of the Government Code.

(3) Present affidavits and other documentary evidence.

(4) Present oral argument.

(e) The board, or an administrative law judge sitting alone as provided in subdivision (h), shall issue a decision on the petition for interim order within five business days following submission of the matter. The standard of proof required to obtain an interim order pursuant to this section shall be a preponderance of the evidence standard. If the interim order was previously issued without notice, the board shall determine whether the order shall remain in effect, be dissolved, or modified.

(f) The board shall file an accusation within 15 days of the issuance of an interim order. In the case of an interim order issued without notice, the time shall run from the date of the order issued after the noticed hearing. If the licentiate files a Notice of Defense, the hearing shall be held within 30 days of the agency’s receipt of the Notice of Defense. A decision shall be rendered on the accusation no later than 30 days after submission of the matter. Failure to comply with any of the requirements in this subdivision shall dissolve the interim order by operation of law.

(g) Interim orders shall be subject to judicial review pursuant to Section 1094.5 of the Code of Civil Procedure and shall be heard only in the superior court in and for the Counties of Sacramento, San Francisco, Los Angeles, or San Diego. The review of an interim order shall be limited to a determination of whether the board abused its discretion in the issuance of the interim order. Abuse of discretion is established if the respondent board has not proceeded in the manner required by law, or if the court determines that the interim order is not supported by substantial evidence in light of the whole record.

(h) The board may, in its sole discretion, delegate the hearing on any petition for an interim order to an administrative law judge in the Office of Administrative Hearings. If the board hears the noticed petition itself, an administrative law judge shall preside at the hearing, rule on the admission and exclusion of evidence, and advise the board on matters of law. The board shall exercise all other powers relating to the conduct of the hearing but may delegate any or all of them to the administrative law judge. When the petition has been delegated to an administrative law judge, he or she shall sit alone and exercise all of the powers of the board relating to the conduct of the hearing. A decision issued by an administrative law judge sitting alone shall be final when it is filed with the board. If the administrative law judge issues an interim order without notice, he or she shall preside at the noticed hearing, unless unavailable, in which case another administrative law judge may hear the matter. The decision of the administrative law judge sitting alone on the petition for an interim order is final, subject only to judicial review in accordance with subdivision (g).

(i) Failure to comply with an interim order issued pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall constitute a separate cause for disciplinary action against any licentiate, and may be heard at, and as a part of, the noticed hearing provided for in subdivision (f). Allegations of noncompliance with the interim order may be filed at any time prior to the rendering of a decision on the accusation. Violation of the interim order is established upon proof that the licentiate was on notice of the interim order and its terms, and that the order was in effect at the time of the violation. The finding of a violation of an interim order made at the hearing on the accusation shall be reviewed as a part of any review of a final decision of the agency.

If the interim order issued by the agency provides for anything less than a complete suspension of the licentiate from his or her business or profession, and the licentiate violates the interim order prior to the hearing on the accusation provided for in subdivision (f), the agency may, upon notice to the licentiate and proof of violation, modify or expand the interim order.

(j) A plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction after a plea of nolo contendere is deemed to be a conviction within the meaning of this section. A certified record of the conviction shall be conclusive evidence of the fact that the conviction occurred. A board may take action under this section notwithstanding the fact that an appeal of the conviction may be taken.
